New Jersey, session 222, A2328.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  For the purposes of this section, "Green Acres bond act" means P.L.2009, c.117, P.L.2007, c.119, P.L.1995, c.204, P.L.1992, c.88, and P.L.1989, c.183. b.  There is appropriated the sum of $50,300,000 from dedicated corporation business tax revenues pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution in the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund, established pursuant to section 6 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-48), to the Department of Environmental Protection for the development of lands by the State for recreation and conservation purposes in accordance with the provisions of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.).  Of the amount appropriated pursuant to this subsection, the sum of $9,100,000 is available due to interest earnings on the dedicated corporation business tax revenues pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution. c.  There is appropriated $4,700,000 from the funds established pursuant to any Green Acres bond act and the Garden State Green Acres Preservation Trust Fund, established pursuant to the "Garden State Preservation Trust Act," P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.), to the Department of Environmental Protection for the development of lands by the State for recreation and conservation purposes in accordance with the provisions of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.).  Of the amount appropriated pursuant to this subsection, the sum of $4,700,000 is available due to interest earnings. d.  The funds appropriated pursuant to subsections b. and c. of this section shall be allocated as follows: Project Amount BOATING & FISHING ACCESS Access Facilities 1,000,000 CAMPING DEVELOPMENT Camping, Cabin/Shelter Program 3,000,000 Sanitary Facilities 3,000,000 HABITAT ENHANCEMENT & ACCESS Habitat Enhancements & Access 2,500,000 INFRASTRUCTURE Bridge Repairs                                                                                                 2,000,000 Building Repairs and Renovations 5,200,000 Dam Inspections, Repairs, Removals 2,000,000 Health and Life Safety Projects 10,000,000 Historic Structure Stabilization and Repairs 6,000,000 Recreational Development 13,200,000 Road Repairs 2,000,000 IN-HOUSE PROJECTS 525,000 PALISADES INTERSTATE PARK COMMISSION 800,000 OTHER Contingency Fund for Repairs 2,525,000 Administration 1,250,000 TOTAL                                                                                                 $55,000,000 e.     Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection e. of section 6 of P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-48) or any other law to the contrary, the expenditure of funds pursuant to this section shall not require the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, or its successor.  The department may reallocate funds among the projects identified in subsection d. of this section, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury.  The department shall send written notification of any such reallocation of funds to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the General Assembly, the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer, the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, or its successor, and the Chairs of the Senate Environment and Energy Committee and Assembly Environment and Solid Waste Committee, or their respective successor committees. 2.  There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Preserve New Jersey Green Acres Fund, established pursuant to section 6 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-48), the sum of $41,200,000 to implement the provisions of section 1 of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.